Missouri, session 2026, HB2482.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 210.564 and 210.566, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 210.564 and 210.566, to read as follows:
210.564. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Foster [Care]
Youth Bill of Rights".
2. The children's division shall provide every school-aged foster child and his or her
foster parent with an age-appropriate orientation and explanation of the foster [care] youth
bill of rights. Any children's division office, residential care facility, child placing agency, or
other agency involved in the care and placement of foster children shall post the foster [care]
youth bill of rights in the office, facility, or agency. The children's division shall also make
the foster [care] youth bill of rights and the procedures regarding how to file a grievance
and pursue equitable relief in court readily available and easily accessible online.
3. [The foster care bill of rights shall be as follows:
(1) In all circumstances, the best interests of the child shall be the first priority of the
children's division;
(2) Recognizing the importance of familial stability in foster care and adoption
placement, it shall be the practice of the children's division, when appropriate, to support a
child's return to the custody and care of the parents or guardians with whom the child resided
immediately prior to state custody;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2482 2
(3) When restoration of care and custody is not appropriate or possible, the children's
division shall attempt to place the child with suitable relatives in accordance with section
210.565;
(4) The children's division shall further support familial stability by ensuring
continuity of foster placement, except in instances where cause for a change in a child's
placement is reasonably found;
(5) The children's division shall work with each child in state custody to develop both
a permanency plan and a case plan. These plans shall be developed within twelve months of a
child's entrance into state custody. The permanency plan shall include the child's immediate
and long-term placement goals, while the case plan shall address a child's specific medical
and emotional needs;
(6) Recognizing the value of familial relationships in foster care and adoption
settings, it shall be the practice of the children's division to place siblings in the same foster
care, kinship, guardianship, or adoptive placement, unless doing so would be contrary to the
safety or well-being of any of the siblings. If siblings are not placed together, it shall be the
practice of the children's division to support regular visitation and communication between
siblings in state custody, and between children in state custody and their parents and relatives,
where not otherwise prohibited or against a child's best interests; and
(7) The children's division shall support all children twelve years of age or older in
state custody to attend any hearings pertaining to the child's placement, custody, or care,
provided that the child is willing and able to attend such hearings, and that attending such
hearings is in the best interests of the child.] In order to ensure proper care and protection
of a child in the child welfare system, the following rights shall be afforded to the child:
(1) The right to live in a safe, comfortable place:
(a) With the least restrictive environment;
(b) Where the child is treated with respect, has a place to store the child's
belongings, and receives healthy food, adequate clothing, and appropriate personal
hygiene products; and
(c) With siblings, if practicable;
(2) The right to communicate and visit with family, including siblings who are
not placed with the child or are in state custody;
(3) The right to as few disruptions and placements as practicable;
(4) The right to have and maintain belongings by:
(a) Making a list of the child's belongings when placed out of the home;
(b) Providing such list of belongings to the child's case manager;
(c) Bringing such belongings when placed out of the home; and

HB 2482 3
(d) If going on a visit or to a new placement, having the belongings packed and
transported for the visit or move;
(5) The right to educational stability, which includes:
(a) Remaining in the child's school of origin unless it is in the child's best
interests to transfer to a different school;
(b) Access to records, supplies, services, and tutoring and transportation to all
appropriate school activities, including extracurricular and personal enrichment
activities;
(c) Daily school attendance;
(d) Receipt of a high school diploma if such child has earned the standard
credits, including partial credits, or a certificate of high school equivalence (GED); and
(e) Knowing the identity of and the ability to communicate with the school's
educational liaison designated under section 167.018;
(6) The right to be notified of all hearings held, if age or developmentally
appropriate;
(7) The right to attend all court hearings, either in-person or virtually, if age or
developmentally appropriate;
(8) The right to address the court regarding any proposed placement or
placement change, if age or developmentally appropriate;
(9) The right to have a client-directed attorney who contacts the child regularly
and, if a conflict of interest exists, the right to have a new attorney who will represent
the position of the child;
(10) The right to privacy, including the ability to send and receive unopened mail
and make and receive phone calls;
(11) The right to regular and private contact with and access to case managers,
attorneys, and advocates;
(12) The right to access information that is accurate and necessary for the child's
wellbeing from case managers, guardians, and any persons who are by law liable to
maintain, care for, or support the child;
(13) The right to have as few case managers as practicable, to be notified if a case
manager changes, to have the current case manager's contact information, and to
contact the case manager as necessary;
(14) The right to contact a case manager's supervisor if there is a conflict that
cannot be resolved between the child and the child's case manager;
(15) The right to report a violation of this section without fear of punishment,
interference, coercion, or retaliation; and

HB 2482 4
(16) The right to a timely permanency plan, case plan, and transition plan, when
applicable, as provided by this section.
4. (1) The children's division shall work with each child in state custody to
develop both a permanency plan and a case plan. These plans shall be developed within
twelve months of a child's entrance into state custody. The permanency plan shall
include the child's immediate and long-term placement goals. The case plan shall
address the child's specific medical and emotional needs.
(2) When a child is transitioning out of the child welfare system, the child shall:
(a) Be an active participant in developing the transition plan;
(b) Have services and benefits explained;
(c) Have a checking or savings account;
100 (d) Learn to manage money, when age or developmentally appropriate;
101 (e) Learn job skills that are age or developmentally appropriate;
102 (f) Be involved in life skills training and activities; and
103 (g) Be provided assistance with applying for college or vocational programs,
104 federal financial assistance, including the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, and
105 tuition waivers.
106 5. The rights under this section and section 167.018 and the provisions of section
107 167.019 may be enforced through equitable relief as part of the corresponding case
108 under this chapter. Failure to file a grievance with the children's division, their
109 contractors, or the school district shall not preempt or prevent the child from
110 contemporaneously pursuing equitable relief as part of the corresponding case under
111 this chapter.
210.566. 1. (1) The children's division and its contractors, recognizing that foster
parents or kinship foster parentsare not clients but rather are colleagues in the child welfare
team, shall treat foster parents or kinship foster parents in a manner consistent with the
National Association of Social Workers' ethical standards of conduct as described in its Social
Workers' Ethical Responsibilities to Colleagues. Foster parents or kinship foster parents
shall treat the children in their care, the child's birth family and members of the child welfare
team in a manner consistent with their ethical responsibilities as professional team members.
(2) The children's division and its contractors shall provide written notification of the
rights enumerated in this section at the time a child is placed with the prospective foster
parent or prospective kinship foster parent, at initial licensure, and at the time of each
licensure renewal following the initial licensure period.
(3) The children's division and its contractors shall not discriminate against
foster parents or kinship foster parents and shall be in accordance with the laws under
chapter 213 and federal law.

HB 2482 5
2. (1) The children's division and its contractors shall provide foster parents or
kinship foster parents with regularly scheduled opportunities for preservice training, and
regularly scheduled opportunities for pertinent inservice training, as determined by the
Missouri State Foster Care and Adoption Advisory Board.
(2) The children's division and its contractors shall provide to foster parents, kinship
foster parents, and potential adoptive parents, prior to placement, all pertinent information,
including but not limited to full disclosure of all medical, psychological, and psychiatric
conditions of the child, as well as information from previous placements that would indicate
that the child or children may have a propensity to cause violence to any member of the foster
family home or kinship foster family home. The foster parents or kinship foster parents
shall be provided with any information regarding the child or the child's family, including but
not limited to the case plan, any family history of mental or physical illness, sexual abuse of
the child or sexual abuse perpetrated by the child, criminal background of the child or the
child's family, fire-setting or other destructive behavior by the child, substance abuse by the
child or child's family, or any other information which is pertinent to the care and needs of the
child and to protect the foster or adoptive family. The children's division and its contractors
shall provide full access to the child's medical, psychological, and psychiatric records in its
possession at the time of placement, including records prior to the child coming into care, at
the time the child is placed with a foster parent or kinship foster parent. After initial
placement, the children's division and its contractors shall have a continuing duty and
obligation to provide access to such records that come into its possession or of which the
division or its contractors become aware. Access shall include providing information and
authorization for foster parents or kinship foster parents to review or to obtain the records
directly from the medical, psychological, or psychiatric services provider. A foster parent or
kinship foster parent may decline access to any or all of the child's records. Knowingly
providing false or misleading information to foster parents or kinship foster parentsin order
to secure placement shall be denoted in the caseworker's personnel file and shall be kept on
record by the division.
(3) The children's division and its contractors shall arrange preplacement visits,
except in emergencies.
(4) The foster parents or kinship foster parents may ask questions about the child's
case plan, encourage a placement or refuse a placement without reprisal from the caseworker
or agency. After a placement, the children's division and its contractors shall update the foster
parents or kinship foster parents as new information about the child is gathered.
(5) Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall be informed in a timely manner by
the children's division and its contractors of all team meetings and staffings concerning their

HB 2482 6
licensure status or children placed in their homes, and shall be allowed to participate,
consistent with section 210.761.
(6) The children's division and its contractors shall establish reasonably accessible
respite care for children in foster care for short periods of time, jointly determined by foster
parents or kinship foster parents and the child's caseworker pursuant to section 210.545.
Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall follow all procedures established by the
children's division and its contractors for requesting and using respite care.
(7) Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall treat all information received from
the children's division and its contractors about the child and the child's family as
confidential. Information necessary for the medical or psychiatric care of the child may be
provided to the appropriate practitioners. Foster parents or kinship foster parentsmay share
information necessary with school personnel in order to secure a safe and appropriate
education for the child. Additionally, foster parents or kinship foster parents shall share
information they may learn about the child and the child's family, and concerns that arise in
the care of the child, with the caseworker and other members of the child welfare team.
Recognizing that placement changes are difficult for children, foster parents or kinship
foster parents shall seek all necessary information, and participate in preplacement visits
whenever possible, before deciding whether to accept a child for placement.
3. (1) Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall make decisions about the daily
living concerns of the child, and shall be permitted to continue the practice of their own
family values and routines while respecting the child's cultural heritage. All discipline shall
be consistent with state laws and regulations. The children's division shall allow foster
parents or kinship foster parents to help plan visitation between the child and the child's
siblings or biological family. Visitations should be scheduled at a time that meets the needs of
the child, the biological family members, and the foster family or kinship foster family
whenever possible. Recognizing that visitation with family members is an important right of
children in foster care, foster parents or kinship foster parents shall be flexible and
cooperative with regard to family visits. The children's division shall not require foster
parents or kinship foster parents to conduct supervised visits or be present during any
supervised visits between the child and the child's siblings or biological family.
(2) Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall provide care that is respectful of
the child's cultural identity and needs. Recognizing that cultural competence can be learned,
the children's division and their contractors shall provide foster parents or kinship foster
parents with training that specifically addresses cultural needs of children, including but not
limited to, information on skin and hair care, information on any specific religious or cultural
practices of the child's biological family, and referrals to community resources for ongoing
education and support.

HB 2482 7
(3) Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall recognize that the purpose of
discipline is to teach and direct the behavior of the child, and ensure that it is administered in
a humane and sensitive manner. Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall use discipline
methods which are consistent with children's division policy.
4. (1) Consistent with state laws and regulations, the children's division and its
contractors shall provide, upon request by the foster parents or kinship foster parents,
information about a child's progress after the child leaves foster care.
(2) Except in emergencies, foster parents or kinship foster parents shall be given
two weeks advance notice and a written statement of the reasons before a child is removed
from their care. When requesting removal of a child from their home, foster parents or
kinship foster parents shall give two weeks advance notice, consistent with division policy,
to the child's caseworker, except in emergency situations.
100 (3) Recognizing the critical nature of attachment for children, if a child reenters the
101 foster care system and is not placed in a relative home or with kinship foster parents, the
102 child's former foster parents shall be given first consideration for placement of the child.
103 (4) If a child becomes [free] available for adoption while in foster care, the child's
104 foster family or kinship foster family shall be given preferential consideration as adoptive
105 parents consistent with section 453.070.
106 (5) If a foster child becomes [free] available for adoption and the foster parents or
107 kinship foster parents desire to adopt the child, they shall inform the caseworker within
108 sixty days of the caseworker's initial query. If they do not choose to pursue adoption, foster
109 parents or kinship foster parents shall make every effort to support and encourage the
110 child's placement in a permanent home, including but not limited to providing information on
111 the history and care needs of the child and accommodating transitional visitation.
112 5. Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall be informed by the court no later
113 than two weeks prior to all court hearings pertaining to a child in their care, and informed of
114 their right to attend and participate, consistent with section 211.464.
115 6. (1) The rights under this section may be enforced through equitable relief as
116 part of the corresponding case under this chapter.
117 (2) The children's division and their contractors shall provide notification of and
118 access to a fair [and], impartial, and timely grievance process [to address licensure, case
119 management decisions, and delivery of service issues]. Foster parents or kinship foster
120 parentsshall have timely access to the[child placement agency's appeals] grievanceprocess,
121 and shall be free from acts of fear of punishment, interference, coercion, or retaliation
122 when exercising the right to [appeal] file a grievance.
123 (3) Failure to file a grievance with the children's division or their contractors
124 under section 210.526 shall not preempt or prevent foster parents or kinship foster

HB 2482 8
125 parents from contemporaneously pursuing equitable relief as part of the corresponding
126 case under this chapter.
127 7. The children's division and their contractors shall provide training to foster parents
128 or kinship foster parents on the policies and procedures governing the licensure of foster
129 homes or kinship foster homes, the provision of foster care or kinship foster care, and the
130 adoption process. Foster parents or kinship foster parents shall, upon request, be provided
131 with written documentation of the policies of the children's division and their contractors. Per
132 licensure requirements, foster parents or kinship foster parents shall comply with the
133 policies of the child placement agency.
134 8. (1) For purposes of this section, "foster parent" means a resource family providing
135 care of children in state custody.
136 (2) For purposes of this section, "kinship foster parent" or "kinship foster
137 parents" mean grandparents or other persons related to the child by blood or affinity or
138 persons who are not related to the child but have a close relationship with the child or
139 the child's family.
✔